Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2504.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 402(c) of the act of June 22, 1937 (P.L.1987, No.394), known as The Clean Streams Law, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 402. Potential Pollution.--* * *(c) * * *12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 (3) A residential construction site that results in land disturbance of more than one acre and less than three acres may apply to waive the otherwise applicable requirements for a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit in accordance with 40 CFR 122.26(b)(15)(i) (relating to storm water discharges (applicable to State NPDES programs, see § 123.25)). Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2504PN3390 - 2 - 1234567